Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.900

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the "Recreation Districts Act for Counties."

[ 1969 c 26 s 7; 1967 c 63 s 7; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.900. Prior: 1961 c 272 s 7; 1959 c 304 s 9; 1957 c 58 s 33.]